Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1588.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3-7-111 of Title 27A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Spring
Creek Watershed Study Act”.
B. The Legislature finds that:
1. Increasing pressure from agriculture and residential
development as well as stream bank erosion and other activities have
led to declining water quality levels in the Northeast Oklahoma
watershed known as Spring Creek located in Cherokee, Delaware, and
Mayes counties near Kansas, Oklahoma, resulting in increased concern

by the residents of the Spring Creek area and citizens of Oklahoma
as a whole as to the continued health of the watershed. The once
pristine stream is a prime example of how many similar high quality
Ozark waterbodies that draw millions of visitors to the area each
year, support water supplies for growing urban centers in Oklahoma,
and provide habitat for important wildlife and fisheries resources
are threatened without cooperative, voluntary protective action by
local communities and other stakeholders;
2. Improved voluntary land management practices including soil
conservation practices, riparian restoration and protection,
reforestation, streambank livestock exclusion, and other methods of
stewardship have great potential to improve and protect the quality
of water in the Spring Creek watershed while improving the
ecological health of the area; and
3. It is in the interest of the citizens of this state as a
whole and the residents of the Spring Creek watershed that the
Oklahoma Conservation Commission, in partnership with other local,
state, and federal agencies and nongovernmental organizations,
undertake a comprehensive water quality study of Spring Creek to
determine the best course of action to protect and improve the
health of the aquatic habitat in the watershed.
C. It is the intent of the Legislature that the findings of
this study will be used to direct implementation of voluntary,
incentive-based conservation practices by the Commission in
partnership with other local, state, and federal agencies and
subject to availability of resources, in the Spring Creek watershed
to protect and improve the aquatic habitat and water quality in the
area.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3-7-112 of Title 27A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. 1. The Oklahoma Conservation Commission shall undertake a
comprehensive watershed-based water quality plan designed to improve
and protect the water quality and aquatic habitat in the Spring
Creek watershed through the utilization of voluntary, incentive-
based programs.
2. On or before June 1, 2026, the Commission shall publish an
electronic report of the findings. The Commission may, from time to
ENR. H. B. NO. 1588 Page 2

time, update such findings as conditions change and pertinent
information becomes available.
B. The Commission may contract and cooperate with the Natural
Resources Conservation Service of the United States Department of
Agriculture and the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency to conduct
activities provided for in this section.
C. The Commission may apply for and accept grants, gifts, or
other sources of public and private funds to carry out the purposes
of the Spring Creek Watershed Study Act.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3-7-113 of Title 27A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the Oklahoma Conservation Commission to be designated the
“Spring Creek Watershed Study Cash Fund Revolving Fund”. The fund
shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations,
and shall consist of all monies received by the Commission from
appropriations by the Legislature to the fund, and any money
received as gifts, grants, or other contributions from public or
private sources provided for the purpose of implementing the Spring
Creek Watershed Study Act. All monies accruing to the credit of the
fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the
Commission for the purpose provided for in this act. Expenditures
from the fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State
Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with the
Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for
approval and payment.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1588 Page 3

Passed the House of Representatives the 4th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 1st day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1588 Page 4